Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 3. Computation of Time; Tolling of Statute

§ 551.
Minority, incapacity, or imprisonment.

When a person entitled to bring an action specified in this chapter is a minor, lacks capacity to protect his or her interests due to a mental condition or psychiatric disability, or is imprisoned at the time the cause of action accrues, such person may bring such action within the times in this chapter respectively limited, after the disability is removed.

If a person entitled to bring an action specified in this chapter becomes unable to protect his or her interests due to a mental condition or psychiatric disability after the cause of action accrues but before the statute has run, the time during which the person is unable to protect his or her interests due to a mental condition or psychiatric disability shall not be taken as a part of the time limited for the commencement of the action.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. date, see note set out below;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 45.

§ 552.
Absence from State.

If a person is out of the State when a cause of action of a personal nature mentioned in this chapter accrues against him or her, the action may be commenced within the time limited therefor after such person comes into the State.
If a person is absent from and resides out of the State after a cause of action accrues against him or her and before the statute has run, and he or she has not known property within the State which can by common process of law be attached, the time of his or her absence shall not be taken as a part of the time limited for the commencement of the action.
The provisions of this section shall not extend to a cause of action accruing in another state or government, when the parties thereto at the time of the accruing of such cause of action are residents of such other state or government.

Partners.

Debt may become barred by statute of limitations as to one member of a partnership in State and not as to those out of state. Spaulding v. Ludlow Woolen Mill, 36 Vt. 150, 1863 Vt. LEXIS 53 (1863).

§ 553.
Member of Armed Services; tolling statute of limitations.

When an inhabitant of this State is in the Military or Naval Service of the United States or is a member of the Vermont National Guard and has been ordered to State active duty and, at the time of entering such service or duty, had a cause of action against another person, or another person had a cause of action against him or her, the time spent in such Military or Naval Service outside this State or the time spent in State active duty shall not be taken as part of the time limited for the bringing of an action by or against him or her founded on such causes. The limitation period for a cause of action shall be tolled during the duration of the person’s out-of-state Military or Naval Service, or State Active Duty Service, plus an additional 60 days.

HISTORY:

Amended

2011, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 5a.

§ 554.
Alien enemies in time of war.

When a person is disabled to prosecute an action by being a subject or citizen of a country at war with the United States, the time of the continuance of such war shall not be deemed part of the respective periods limited in this chapter for the commencement of actions.

§ 555.
Fraud.

When a person entitled to bring a personal action is prevented from so doing by the fraudulent concealment of the cause of such action by the person against whom it lies, the period prior to the discovery of such cause of action shall be excluded in determining the time limited for the commencement thereof.

Parties.

In suit by insurance company to recover proceeds paid out, statute of limitations was not tolled with respect to wife who was not involved in causing fire, during period between destruction of barn by fire and charging of husband with hiring person to set fire, where it was not shown that wife fraudulently concealed facts of fire. Stankiewicz v. Estate of LaRose, 151 Vt. 453, 561 A.2d 400, 1989 Vt. LEXIS 80 (1989).

§ 555a.
Fraudulent transfers.

Limitations of actions with respect to fraudulent transfers or obligations under 9 V.S.A. chapter 57, subchapter 1, shall be governed by the provisions of

9 V.S.A. § 2293

.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 17.

§ 556.
Injunction staying action.

When the commencement of an action is stayed by injunction, the time during which such injunction is in force shall not be deemed a part of the time in this chapter limited for the commencement of such action.

§ 557.
Death of party.

If a person, by or against whom an action may be brought, dies before the expiration of the time within which such action may be commenced as provided by this chapter or dies within 30 days after the expiration of such times, the period of limitation as to such action shall cease to operate at the date of his or her death. After the issuance of letters testamentary or of administration, such action, if the cause of action survives, may be commenced by or against the executor or administrator within two years, and not after.

If commissioners are appointed on such estate and the claim against the decedent is a claim proper for the consideration of the commissioners, the same shall be presented to the commissioners within the time allowed other creditors to present their claims. Such claim may be presented to the commissioners any time within 15 years after the date of such death, and not after, but such claim shall be presented in accordance with the provisions of 14 V.S.A. chapter 65.

§ 558.
New action after failure of original action.

The plaintiff may commence a new action for the same cause within one year after the determination of the original action, when the original action has been commenced within the time limited by any statute of this State, and the action has been determined for any of the following reasons:

where the action is dismissed for insufficiency of process caused by unavoidable accident or by default or neglect of the officer to whom the process was committed;

where the action is dismissed for lack of jurisdiction of the subject matter or person, improper venue, or failure to join an indispensable party;

where the action is defeated or avoided by the death of a party thereto;

where judgment for the plaintiff is reversed on appeal on one of the grounds listed in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection.

If the cause of action survives, the plaintiff’s executor or administrator may commence the action within one year after the determination of the original action. If an executor or administrator is not appointed within that time, then the new action may be commenced within one year after letters testamentary or of administration are granted.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 34, eff. March 29, 1972;

1973, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. date, see note set out below.

Form of action.

Where plaintiff was at law, driven to nonsuit by decision of court that form of action could not be sustained, he could commence another action in one year from the termination of that action before the statute of limitations would run at law. Spear & Carlton v. Newell, 13 Vt. 288, 1841 Vt. LEXIS 61 (1841).

§ 559.
Rights not affected by a descent cast.

The right of a person to the possession of real estate shall not be impaired or affected by a descent being cast in consequence of the death of a person in possession of such estate.

§ 560.
Childhood sexual abuse.

When a person entitled to bring an action for damages as a result of childhood sexual abuse is unable to commence the action as a direct result of the damages caused by the sexual abuse, the period during which the person is incapacitated shall not be taken as a part of the time limited for commencement of the action.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 292

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.